Missouri, session 2026, HB2753.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 302.302, RSMo, is repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 302.302, 304.1020, and 304.1023, to read as follows:
302.302. 1. The director of revenue shall put into effect a point system for the
suspension and revocation of licenses. Points shall be assessed only after a conviction or
forfeiture of collateral. The initial point value is as follows:
(1) Any moving violation of a state law or county or
municipal or federal traffic ordinance or regulation
not listed in this section, other than a violation of
vehicle equipment provisions or a court-ordered
supervision as provided in section 302.303 2 points
(except any violation of municipal stop sign
ordinance where no accident is involved 1 point)
(2) Speeding
In violation of a state law 3 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(3) Leaving the scene of an accident in violation of
section 577.060 12 points
In violation of any county or municipal ordinance 6 points
(4) Careless and imprudent driving in violation of
subsection 4 of section 304.016 4 points
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2753 2
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(5) Operating without a valid license in violation of
subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of section
302.020:
(a) For the first conviction 2 points
(b) For the second conviction 4 points
(c) For the third conviction 6 points
(6) Operating with a suspended or revoked license
prior to restoration of operating privileges 12 points
(7) Obtaining a license by misrepresentation 12 points
(8) For the first conviction of driving while in an
intoxicated condition or under the influence of
controlled substances or drugs 8 points
(9) For the second or subsequent conviction of any of
the following offenses however combined: driving
while in an intoxicated condition, driving under the
influence of controlled substances or drugs or
driving with a blood alcohol content of eight-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight 12 points
(10) For the first conviction for driving with blood
alcohol content eight-hundredths of one percent or
more by weight
In violation of state law 8 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance or
federal law or regulation 8 points
(11) Any felony involving the use of a motor vehicle 12 points
(12) Knowingly permitting unlicensed operator to
operate a motor vehicle 4 points
(13) For a conviction for failure to maintain financial
responsibility pursuant to county or municipal
ordinance or pursuant to section 303.025 4 points
(14) Endangerment of a highway worker in violation of
section 304.585 4 points
(15) Aggravated endangerment of a highway worker in
violation of section 304.585 12 points

HCS HB 2753 3
(16) For a conviction of violating a municipal ordinance
that prohibits tow truck operators from stopping at
or proceeding to the scene of an accident unless
they have been requested to stop or proceed to such
scene by a party involved in such accident or by an
officer of a public safety agency 4 points
(17) Endangerment of an emergency responder in
violation of section 304.894 4 points
(18) Aggravated endangerment of an emergency
responder in violation of section 304.894 12 points
(19) Endangerment of a pedestrian in a hospital zone
in violation of section 304.1023 4 points
(20) Aggravated endangerment of a pedestrian in a
hospital zone in violation of section 304.1023 12 points
2. The director shall, as provided in subdivision (5) of subsection 1 of this section,
assess an operator points for a conviction pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
section 302.020, when the director issues such operator a license or permit pursuant to the
provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.340.
3. An additional two points shall be assessed when personal injury or property
damage results from any violation listed in subdivisions (1) to (13) of subsection 1 of this
section and if found to be warranted and certified by the reporting court.
4. When any of the acts listed in subdivision (2), (3), (4) or (8) of subsection 1 of this
section constitutes both a violation of a state law and a violation of a county or municipal
ordinance, points may be assessed for either violation but not for both. Notwithstanding that
an offense arising out of the same occurrence could be construed to be a violation of
subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection 1 of this section, no person shall be tried or
convicted for more than one offense pursuant to subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection 1
of this section for offenses arising out of the same occurrence.
5. The director of revenue shall put into effect a system for staying the assessment of
points against an operator. The system shall provide that the satisfactory completion of a
driver-improvement program or, in the case of violations committed while operating a
motorcycle, a motorcycle-rider training course approved by the state highways and
transportation commission, by an operator, when so ordered and verified by any court
having jurisdiction over any law of this state or county or municipal ordinance, regulating
motor vehicles, other than a violation committed in a commercial motor vehicle as defined in
section 302.700 or a violation committed by an individual who has been issued a commercial

HCS HB 2753 4
driver's license or is required to obtain a commercial driver's license in this state or any other
state, shall be accepted by the director in lieu of the assessment of points for a violation
pursuant to subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection 1 of this section or pursuant to subsection
3 of this section. The operator shall be given the option to complete the driver-improvement
program through an online or in-person course. A court using a centralized violation bureau
established under section 476.385 may elect to have the bureau order and verify completion
of a driver-improvement program or motorcycle-rider training course as prescribed by order
of the court. For the purposes of this subsection, the driver-improvement program shall meet
or exceed the standards of the National Safety Council's eight-hour "Defensive Driving
Course" or, in the case of a violation which occurred during the operation of a motorcycle, the
100 program shall meet the standards established by the state highways and transportation
101 commission pursuant to sections 302.133 to 302.137. The completion of a driver-
102 improvement program or a motorcycle-rider training course shall not be accepted in lieu of
103 points more than one time in any thirty-six-month period and shall be completed within sixty
104 days of the date of conviction in order to be accepted in lieu of the assessment of points.
105 Every court having jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall, within
106 fifteen days after completion of the driver-improvement program or motorcycle-rider training
107 course by an operator, forward a record of the completion to the director, all other provisions
108 of the law to the contrary notwithstanding. The director shall establish procedures for record
109 keeping and the administration of this subsection.
304.1020. 1. As used in this section, "hospital zone" means any area upon or
around any highway as defined in section 302.010 that is visibly marked by a sign
erected by a county or municipality as an area where hospital-related activities are
occurring. The term "hospital" shall be as defined in section 190.100.
2. Any county or municipality that elects to establish a hospital zone designation
for streets surrounding a hospital may erect signs upon or around the hospital zone that
are clearly visible from the highway and clearly identify the boundaries of the hospital
zone. Prior to establishing a hospital zone, the county or municipality shall be
responsible for determining the boundaries of the zone and shall assume responsibility
for all costs associated with establishing the hospital zone. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, the maximum speed limit within any designated
hospital zone shall be thirty miles per hour.
3. Upon a conviction or a plea of guilty by any person for a moving violation as
defined in section 302.010, or any offense listed in section 302.302, the court may double
the amount of fine authorized to be imposed by law if the offense occurred within a
hospital zone.

HCS HB 2753 5
4. Upon a conviction or a plea of guilty by any person for a speeding violation
under section 304.009 or 304.010, the court may double the amount of fine authorized to
be imposed by law if the offense occurred within a hospital zone. However, no person
assessed an additional fine under this subsection shall also be assessed an additional fine
under subsection 3 of this section.
5. The penalty authorized under subsections 3 and 4 of this section shall be
assessed by the court only if the county or municipality has erected signs upon or
around a hospital zone that are clearly visible from the highway and state substantially
the following message: "Hospital Zone – Fines Doubled".
6. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to enhance the assessment
of court costs or the assessment of points under section 302.302.
304.1023. 1. A person shall be deemed to commit the offense of endangerment of
a pedestrian in a hospital zone upon conviction for any of the following when the offense
occurs within a hospital zone, as defined in section 304.1020:
(1) Exceeding the posted speed limit by fifteen miles per hour or more; or
(2) Committing any of the following offenses for which points may be assessed
under section 302.302:
(a) Leaving the scene of an accident in violation of section 577.060;
(b) Careless and imprudent driving in violation of subsection 4 of section
304.016;
(c) Operating without a valid license in violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection 1 of section 302.020;
(d) Operating with a suspended or revoked license;
(e) Driving while in an intoxicated condition or under the influence of controlled
substances or drugs or driving with an excessive blood alcohol content; or
(f) Any felony involving the use of a motor vehicle.
2. Upon conviction or a plea of guilty for committing the offense of
endangerment of a pedestrian in a hospital zone under subsection 1 of this section, if
no injury or death to a pedestrian resulted from the offense, the person shall be subject
to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars and shall have four points assessed to his
or her driver's license under section 302.302 in addition to any other penalty authorized
by law.
3. A person shall be deemed to commit the offense of aggravated endangerment
of a pedestrian in a hospital zone upon conviction or a plea of guilty for any offense
under subsection 1 of this section when such offense occurs in a hospital zone as defined
in section 304.1020 and results in the injury or death of a pedestrian. Upon conviction
or a plea of guilty for committing the offense of aggravated endangerment of a

HCS HB 2753 6
pedestrian in a hospital zone, in addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the
person shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars if the offense
resulted in an injury to a pedestrian and ten thousand dollars if the offense resulted in
death of a pedestrian. In addition, such person shall have twelve points assessed to their
driver's license under section 302.302 and shall be subject to the provisions of section
302.304 regarding the revocation of the person's license and driving privileges.
4. No person shall be cited or convicted for endangerment of a pedestrian in a
hospital zone or aggravated endangerment of a pedestrian in a hospital zone for any act
or omission otherwise constituting an offense under subsection 1 of this section if such
act or omission resulted in whole or in part from mechanical failure of the person's
vehicle or from the negligence of the pedestrian.
5. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other law to the
contrary, the director of the department of revenue or his or her agent shall order the
revocation of a driver's license upon the director's determination that an individual
holding such license was involved in a physical accident where his or her negligent acts
or omissions contributed to his or her vehicle striking a pedestrian within a designated
hospital zone where notice and signage were properly implemented. The department
shall make its determination of these facts on the basis of the report of a law
enforcement officer investigating the incident and this determination shall be final
unless a hearing is requested and held as provided under subdivision (2) of this
subsection. Upon its determination that the facts support a license revocation, the
department shall issue a notice of revocation, which shall be mailed to the person at the
last known address shown on the department's records. The notice is deemed received
three days after mailing unless returned by postal authorities. The notice of revocation
shall clearly specify the reason and statutory grounds for the revocation, the effective
date of the revocation, which shall be at least fifteen days from the date the department
issued its order, the right of the person to request a hearing, and the date by which the
request for a hearing must be made.
(2) An individual who received notice of revocation from the department under
this section may seek reinstatement by either:
(a) Taking and passing the written and driving portions of the driver's license
examination, in which case the individual's driver's license shall be immediately
reinstated; or
(b) Petitioning for a hearing before a circuit division or associate division of the
court in the county in which the hospital zone accident occurred. The individual may
request such court to issue an order staying the revocation until such time as the petition
for review can be heard. If the court, in its discretion, grants such stay, it shall enter the

HCS HB 2753 7
order upon a form prescribed by the director of revenue and shall send a copy of such
order to the director. Such order shall serve as proof of the privilege to operate a motor
vehicle in this state, and the director shall maintain possession of the person's license to
operate a motor vehicle until the termination of any suspension under this subsection.
The clerk of the court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county, and the
prosecutor shall appear at the hearing on behalf of the director of revenue. At the
hearing, the court shall determine only:
a. Whether the person was involved in a physical accident where his or her
vehicle struck a pedestrian within a designated hospital zone;
b. Whether guidelines involving notice and signage were properly implemented
in such hospital zone; and
c. Whether the investigating officer had probable cause to believe the person's
negligent acts or omissions contributed to his or her vehicle striking a pedestrian.

If the court determines subparagraph a., b., or c. of this paragraph not to be in the
affirmative, the court shall order the director to reinstate the license or permit to drive.
(3) The department of revenue administrative adjudication to reinstate a
driver's license that was revoked under this subsection, and any evidence provided to
the department related to such adjudication, shall not be produced by subpoena or any
other means and made available as evidence in any other administrative action, civil
case, or criminal prosecution. The court's determinations issued under this section, and
the evidence provided to the court relating to such determinations, shall not be
produced by subpoena or any other means and made available in any other
administrative action, civil case, or criminal prosecution. Nothing in this subdivision
shall be construed to prevent the department from providing information to the system
authorized under 49 U.S.C. Section 31309, or any successor federal law, pertaining to
the licensure, identification, and disqualification of operators of commercial motor
vehicles.
✔